Illinois, session 104th, HB3347.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 2.01 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/2.01)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42.01)7    Sec. 2.01. All meetings required by this Act to be public 8shall be held at specified times and places which are 9convenient and open to the public. No meeting required by this 10Act to be public shall be held on a legal holiday unless the 11regular meeting day falls on that holiday.12    Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a quorum of 13members of a public body must be physically present at the 14location of an open meeting. If, however, an open meeting of a 15public body (i) with statewide jurisdiction, (ii) that is an 16Illinois library system with jurisdiction over a specific 17geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, (iii) that is 18a municipal transit district with jurisdiction over a specific 19geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, or (iv) that 20is a local workforce investment area with jurisdiction over a 21specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles is 22held simultaneously at one of its offices and one or more other 23locations in a public building, which may include other of its   HB3347- 2 -LRB104 10809 BDA 20890 b1offices, through an interactive video conference and the 2public body provides public notice and public access as 3required under this Act for all locations, then members 4physically present in those locations all count towards 5determining a quorum. "Public building", as used in this 6Section, means any building or portion thereof owned or leased 7by any public body. The requirement that a quorum be 8physically present at the location of an open meeting shall 9not apply, however, to State advisory boards or bodies that do 10not have authority to make binding recommendations or 11determinations or to take any other substantive action. 12    Notwithstanding any other requirement of this Section, a 13public body that is a licensing board authorized by the 14Department of Financial and Professional Regulation may 15conduct a public meeting through an interactive video or 16telephone system without any members being present at any 17physical meeting location, provided that a quorum of members 18is participating and the public body provides public notice 19and public access consistent with the requirements of this 20Act. 21    Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a quorum of 22members of a public body that is not (i) a public body with 23statewide jurisdiction, (ii) an Illinois library system with 24jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 254,500 square miles, (iii) a municipal transit district with 26jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than   HB3347- 3 -LRB104 10809 BDA 20890 b14,500 square miles, or (iv) a local workforce innovation area 2with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 34,500 square miles must be physically present at the location 4of a closed meeting. Other members who are not physically 5present at a closed meeting of such a public body may 6participate in the meeting by means of a video or audio 7conference. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce 8innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 9areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal 10Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 11legislation. 12(Source: P.A. 100-477, eff. 9-8-17; 101-640, eff. 6-12-20.)